Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.16.030

Homicide—When excusable.

Homicide is excusable when committed by accident or misfortune in doing any lawful act by lawful means, without criminal negligence, or without any unlawful intent.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 8; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.16.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 244: See RCW 9A.44.902.